Hawaii, session 2026, SB1325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 163D-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted and to read as follows: ""Agricultural tourism" means commercial activity conducted on a working farm, or a farming operation as defined in section 165-2, for the enjoyment, education, or involvement of visitors; provided that the agricultural tourism activity is accessory and secondary to the principal agricultural use and does not interfere with surrounding farm operations." SECTION 2. Section 163D-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "enterprise" to read as follows: ""Enterprise" means a business with its principal place of business in Hawaii, which is, or proposes to be, engaged in agricultural crop development, development of new value-added products, enhancement of existing agricultural commodities, and the application of existing agricultural appurtenant facilities to productive uses; provided that the majority of whatever the corporation produces shall be used for export.  "Enterprise" includes a business engaged in agricultural tourism." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST